Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2697.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1372 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1372. Exceptional Children; Education and Training.--* * *(9) Burden of Proof for Exceptional Children.(i) Whenever a due process hearing is held in accordance with the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (Public Law 91-230, 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq.) regarding the identification, evaluation, reevaluation, classification, educational placement or disciplinary action of, or the provision of a free 1234567891011121314151617181920 appropriate public education to, an exceptional child, and a local educational agency is a party:(A) Except as provided in clause (B), the local educational agency has the burden of proof.(B) In a case involving a determination of the appropriateness of a private school placement unilaterally selected by a parent or guardian of the exceptional child, the parent or guardian of the exceptional child has the burden of proof.(ii) As used in this subsection, the term "local educational agency" shall have the same meaning as given to that term in 20 U.S.C. § 1401(19) (relating to definitions).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2697PN3776 - 2 - 12345678910111213